West Virginia, session 2026, HB4765.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 15. PUBLIC SAFETY. ARTICLE 2. WEST VIRGINIA STATE POLICE. §15-2-5. Career progression system state; salaries; exclusion from wage and hour laws, with supplemental payment; bond; leave time for members called to duty in guard or reserves. (a) The superintendent shall establish within the West Virginia State Police a system to provide for: (1) The promotion of members to the supervisory ranks of sergeant, first sergeant, second lieutenant, and first lieutenant; (2) the classification of nonsupervisory members within the field operations force to the ranks of trooper, senior trooper, trooper first class, or corporal; and (3) the temporary reclassification of members assigned to administrative duties as administrative support specialist I-VIII. The promotion of individuals in the forensic laboratory shall include the classifications of Evidence Custodians I-IV, Forensic Technicians I-III, Forensic Scientists I-VI, and Forensic Scientist Supervisors I-IV, based on the Forensic Lab Career Progression System.(b) The superintendent may propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code for the purpose of ensuring consistency, predictability, and independent review of any system developed under the provisions of this section.(c) The superintendent shall provide to each member a written manual governing any system established under the provisions of this section and specific procedures shall be identified for the evaluation and testing of members for promotion or reclassification and the subsequent placement of any members on a promotional eligibility or reclassification recommendation list.  A written manual shall also be provided to individuals within the forensic laboratory governing any system established under the provisions of this section and specific procedures shall be identified for the evaluation of promotion or reclassification of those individuals. (d) Effective July 1, 2026, members shall receive annual salaries payable at least twice per month as follows: ANNUAL SALARY SCHEDULE (BASE PAY) SUPERVISORY AND NONSUPERVISORY RANKS Cadet During Training$55,518 Cadet Trooper After Training$62,778 Trooper Second Year$63,790 Trooper Third Year$64,173 Senior Trooper$64,572 Trooper First Class$65,178 Corporal$65,784 Sergeant$70,085 First Sergeant$72,236 Second Lieutenant$74,386 First Lieutenant$76,537 Captain$78,688 Major$80,838 Lieutenant Colonel$82,989 ANNUAL SALARY SCHEDULE (BASE PAY) ADMINISTRATION SUPPORT SPECIALIST CLASSIFICATION I$63,790 II$64,572 III$65,178 IV$65,784 V$70,085 VI$72,236 VII$74,386 VIII$76,537 Effective July 1, 2026, designated individuals within the forensic laboratory shall receive annual base salaries payable at least twice per month as follows: ANNUAL SALARY SCHEDULE (BASE PAY) EVIDENCE CUSTODIAN I$52,644 II$54,972 III$58,633 IV$61,660 FORENSIC TECHNICIAN I$54,844 II$56,538 III$60,420 FORENSIC SCIENTIST I$62,044 II$64,228 III$66,332 IV$68,731 V$72,257 VI$76,057 FORENSIC SCIENTIST SUPERVISOR I$78,756 II$82,320 III$86,098 IV$90,102 Each member of the West Virginia State Police whose salary is fixed and specified in this annual salary schedule is entitled to the length of service increases set forth in subsection (e) of this section and supplemental pay as provided in subsection (g) of this section.(e) Each member of the West Virginia State Police whose salary is fixed and specified pursuant to this section shall receive, and is entitled to, an increase in salary over that set forth in subsection (d) of this section for grade in rank, based on length of service, including that service served before and after the effective date of this section with the West Virginia State Police as follows: Beginning on January 1, 2015, and continuing thereafter, at the end of two years of service with the West Virginia State Police, the member shall receive a salary increase of $500 to be effective during his or her next year of service and a like increase at yearly intervals thereafter, with the increases to be cumulative.  The forensic laboratory employees whose salaries are fixed and specified pursuant to this section, shall receive, and are entitled to, an increase in salary over that set forth in subsection (d) of this section, in accordance with §15-2-7(h) of this code.(f) In applying the salary schedules set forth in this section where salary increases are provided for length of service, members of the West Virginia State Police in service at the time the schedules become effective shall be given credit for prior service and shall be paid the salaries the same length of service entitles them to receive under the provisions of this section.(g) The Legislature finds and declares that because of the unique duties of members of the West Virginia State Police, it is not appropriate to apply the provisions of state wage and hour laws to them. Accordingly, members of the West Virginia State Police are excluded from the provisions of state wage and hour laws. This express exclusion shall not be construed as any indication that the members were or were not covered by the wage and hour laws prior to this exclusion.In lieu of any overtime pay they might otherwise have received under the wage and hour laws, and in addition to their salaries and increases for length of service, members who have completed basic training and who are exempt from federal Fair Labor Standards Act guidelines may receive supplemental pay as provided in this section.The authority of the superintendent to propose a legislative rule or amendment thereto for promulgation in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to establish the number of hours per month which constitute the standard pay period for the members of the West Virginia State Police is hereby continued. The rule shall further establish, on a graduated hourly basis, the criteria for receipt of a portion or all of supplemental payment when hours are worked in excess of the standard pay period. The superintendent shall certify at least twice per month to the West Virginia State Police payroll officer the names of those members who have worked in excess of the standard pay period and the amount of their entitlement to supplemental payment. The supplemental payment may not exceed $200 per pay period. The superintendent and civilian employees of the West Virginia State Police are not eligible for any supplemental payments.(h) Each member of the West Virginia State Police, except the superintendent and civilian employees, shall execute, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, a bond with security in the sum of $5,000 payable to the State of West Virginia, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties, and the bond shall be approved as to form by the Attorney General and as to sufficiency by the Governor.(i) In consideration for compensation paid by the West Virginia State Police to its members during those members’ participation in the West Virginia State Police Cadet Training Program pursuant to §30-29-8 of this code, the West Virginia State Police may require of its members by written agreement entered into with each of them in advance of such participation in the program that, if a member should voluntarily discontinue employment any time within one year immediately following completion of the training program, he or she shall be obligated to pay to the West Virginia State Police a pro rata portion of such compensation equal to that part of such year which the member has chosen not to remain in the employ of the West Virginia State Police.(j) Any member of the West Virginia State Police who is called to perform active duty training or inactive duty training in the National Guard or any reserve component of the armed forces of the United States annually shall be granted, upon request, leave time not to exceed 30 calendar days for the purpose of performing the active duty training or inactive duty training and the time granted may not be deducted from any leave accumulated as a member of the West Virginia State Police. CHAPTER 18A. SCHOOL PERSONNEL. ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-2. State minimum salaries for teachers. (a) For school year 2026-2027, and continuing thereafter, each teacher shall receive the amount prescribed in the State Minimum Salary Schedule as set forth in this section, specific additional amounts prescribed in this section or article, and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code during the contract year.STATE MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE Years Exp4th Class3rd Class2nd ClassA.B.A.B. 15M.A.M.A. 15M.A. 30M.A.45Doctorate 040,61741,30641,57243,01543,77645,54346,30447,06547,82648,861 140,94541,63441,90043,53344,29446,06246,82347,58348,34449,379 241,27441,96242,22844,05244,81346,58047,34148,10248,86349,898 341,60242,29042,55644,57145,33147,09947,86048,62049,38150,416 442,17442,86243,12845,33346,09447,86248,62349,38350,14451,179 542,50243,19043,45645,85246,61348,38049,14149,90250,66351,698 642,83043,51843,78446,37047,13148,89949,66050,42051,18152,216 743,15843,84744,11246,88947,65049,41750,17850,93951,70052,735 843,48644,17544,44147,40748,16849,93650,69751,45752,21853,253 943,81444,50344,76947,92648,68750,45451,21551,97652,73753,772 1044,14344,83145,09748,44649,20650,97451,73552,49653,25654,291 1144,47145,15945,42548,96449,72551,49352,25353,01453,77554,810 1244,79945,48745,75349,48350,24352,01152,77253,53354,29355,328 1345,12745,81546,08150,00150,76252,53053,29054,05154,81255,847 1445,45546,14346,40950,52051,28053,04853,80954,57055,33056,365 1545,78346,47146,73751,03851,79953,56754,32755,08855,84956,884 1646,11146,79947,06551,55752,31754,08554,84655,60756,36757,402 1746,43947,12847,39352,07552,83654,60455,36556,12556,88657,921 1846,76747,45647,72252,59453,35555,12255,88356,64457,40558,440 1947,09547,78448,05053,11253,87355,64156,40257,16257,92358,958 2047,42348,11248,37853,63154,39256,15956,92057,68158,44259,477 2147,75248,44048,70654,14954,91056,67857,43958,19958,96059,995 2248,08048,76849,03454,66855,42957,19657,95758,71859,47960,514 2348,40849,09649,36255,18755,94757,71558,47659,23659,99761,032 2448,73649,42449,69055,70556,46658,23458,99459,75560,51661,551 2549,06449,75250,01856,22456,98458,75259,51360,27461,03462,069 2649,39250,08050,34656,74257,50359,27160,03160,79261,55362,588 2749,72050,40850,67457,26158,02159,78960,55061,31162,07163,106 2850,04850,73751,00257,77958,54060,30861,06861,82962,59063,625 2950,37651,06551,33158,29859,05860,82661,58762,34863,10864,143 3050,70451,39351,65958,81659,57761,34562,10562,86663,62764,662 3151,03351,72151,98759,33560,09661,86362,62463,38564,14565,180 3251,36152,04952,31559,85360,61462,38263,14363,90364,66465,699 3351,68952,37752,64360,37261,13362,90063,66164,42265,18366,218 3452,01752,70552,97160,89061,65163,41964,18064,94065,70166,736 3552,34553,03353,29961,40962,17063,93764,69865,45966,22067,255 (b) Six hundred dollars shall be paid annually to each classroom teacher who has at least 20 years of teaching experience. The payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers.(c) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher providing math instruction in the teacher’s certified area of study for at least 60 percent of the time the teacher is providing instruction to students shall be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection  (a) of this section: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(d) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher certified in special education and employed as a full-time special education teacher, as defined by the State Superintendent, shall be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection (a) of this section: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(e) In accordance with §18A-4-5 of this code, each teacher shall be paid the supplement amount as applicable for his or her classification of certification or classification of training and years of experience as follows, subject to the provisions of that section: (1) For "4th Class" at zero years of experience, $1,781. An additional $38 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(2) For "3rd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,796. An additional $67 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(3) For "2nd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,877. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(4) For "A.B." at zero years of experience, $2,360. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(5) For "A.B. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,452. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(6) For "M.A." at zero years of experience, $2,644. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(7) For "M.A. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,740. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(8) For "M.A. + 30" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(9) For "M.A. + 45" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience; and(10) For "Doctorate" at zero years of experience, $2,927. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience.These payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule, any specific additional amounts prescribed in this section and article and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers. §18A-4-8a. Service personnel minimum monthly salaries. (a) Effective July 1, 2026, the minimum monthly pay for each service employee shall be as follows:(1) For school year 2026-2027 and continuing thereafter, the minimum monthly pay for each service employee whose employment is for a period of more than three and one-half hours a day shall be at least the amounts indicated in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade Schedule set forth in this subdivision and the minimum monthly pay for each service employee whose employment is for a period of three and one-half hours or less a day shall be at least one-half the amount indicated in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade Schedule set forth in this subdivision. STATE MINIMUM PAY SCALE PAY GRADE SCHEDULE YearsPAY GRADE Exp.ABCDEFGH 02,4642,4852,5272,5802,6332,6962,7282,801 12,4962,5182,5592,6122,6662,7292,7602,834 22,5292,5502,5922,6452,6982,7612,7932,866 32,5612,5832,6252,6782,7312,7942,8262,899 42,5942,6162,6572,7102,7632,8272,8582,933 52,6272,6482,6902,7432,7962,8592,8912,965 62,6592,6812,7242,7762,8292,8922,9242,998 72,6932,7132,7562,8082,8612,9252,9563,031 82,7262,7462,7892,8412,8942,9572,9893,063 92,7582,7792,8222,8752,9272,9903,0213,096 102,7912,8122,8542,9072,9593,0243,0553,129 112,8242,8452,8872,9402,9923,0563,0883,161 122,8562,8782,9192,9733,0263,0893,1203,194 132,8892,9102,9523,0053,0583,1213,1533,227 142,9222,9432,9853,0383,0913,1543,1863,259 152,9542,9763,0173,0703,1233,1873,2183,292 162,9873,0083,0503,1033,1563,2193,2513,325 173,0193,0413,0843,1363,1893,2523,2843,358 183,0523,0743,1163,1683,2213,2853,3163,391 193,0863,1063,1493,2013,2543,3173,3493,423 203,1183,1393,1823,2353,2873,3503,3823,457 213,1513,1713,2143,2673,3193,3833,4143,491 223,1843,2053,2473,3003,3523,4163,4483,523 233,2163,2383,2803,3333,3863,4503,4823,557 243,2493,2703,3123,3653,4183,4843,5153,591 253,2823,3033,3453,3983,4523,5163,5493,623 263,3143,3363,3773,4323,4863,5503,5813,657 273,3473,3683,4103,4643,5183,5823,6153,690 283,3803,4013,4443,4983,5523,6163,6493,724 293,4123,4353,4773,5303,5853,6503,6813,758 303,4463,4673,5113,5643,6183,6823,7153,791 313,4793,5013,5453,5983,6523,7163,7493,824 323,5133,5343,5773,6313,6843,7503,7813,858 333,5473,5673,6113,6653,7183,7823,8153,891 343,5793,6013,6453,6993,7523,8163,8493,924 353,6133,6353,6773,7313,7843,8503,8823,958 363,6473,6683,7113,7653,8193,8833,9163,990 373,6793,7023,7453,7993,8533,9173,9494,024 383,7133,7343,7773,8313,8853,9503,9824,058 393,7473,7683,8113,8653,9193,9834,0164,090 403,7793,8023,8443,8983,9534,0174,0494,124 (2) Each service employee shall receive the amount prescribed in the State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade in accordance with the provisions of this subsection according to their class title and pay grade as set forth in this subdivision: CLASS TITLEPAY GRADE Accountant I D Accountant II E Accountant III F Accounts Payable Supervisor G Aide I A Aide II B Aide III C Aide IV D Aide V – Temporary Authorization E Aide V F Aide VI – Temporary Authorization E Aide VI F Audiovisual Technician C Auditor G Autism Mentor F Braille Specialist E Bus Operator D Buyer F Cabinetmaker G Cafeteria Manager D Carpenter I E Carpenter II F Chief Mechanic G Clerk I B Clerk II C Computer Operator E Cook I A Cook II B Cook III C Crew Leader F Custodian I A Custodian II B Custodian III C Custodian IV D Director or Coordinator of Services H Draftsman D Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher I E Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher II E Early Childhood Classroom Assistant Teacher III F Educational Sign Language Interpreter I F Educational Sign Language Interpreter II G Electrician I F Electrician II G Electronic Technician I F Electronic Technician II G Executive Secretary G Food Services Supervisor G Foreman G General Maintenance C Glazier D Graphic Artist D Groundsman B Handyman B Heating and Air Conditioning Mechanic I E Heating and Air Conditioning Mechanic II G Heavy Equipment Operator E Inventory Supervisor D Key Punch Operator B Licensed Practical Nurse F Locksmith G Lubrication Man C Machinist F Mail Clerk D Maintenance Clerk C Mason G Mechanic F Mechanic Assistant E Office Equipment Repairman I F Office Equipment Repairman II G Painter E Paraprofessional F Payroll Supervisor G Plumber I E Plumber II G Printing Operator B Printing Supervisor D Programmer H Roofing/Sheet Metal Mechanic F Sanitation Plant Operator G School Bus Supervisor E Secretary I D Secretary II E Secretary III F Sign Support Specialist E Supervisor of Maintenance H Supervisor of Transportation H Switchboard Operator-Receptionist D Truck Driver D Warehouse Clerk C Watchman B Welder F WVEIS Data Entry and Administrative Clerk B (b) An additional $12 per month is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person who holds a high school diploma or its equivalent.(c) An additional $11 per month also is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds 12 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(2) A service person who holds 24 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(3) A service person who holds 36 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(4) A service person who holds 48 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(5) A service employee who holds 60 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(6) A service person who holds 72 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(7) A service person who holds 84 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(8) A service person who holds 96 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(9) A service person who holds 108 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board;(10) A service person who holds 120 college hours or comparable credit obtained in a trade or vocational school as approved by the state board.(d) An additional $40 per month also is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds an associate’s degree;(2) A service person who holds a bachelor’s degree;(3) A service person who holds a master’s degree;(4) A service person who holds a doctorate degree.(e) An additional $11 per month is added to the minimum monthly pay of each service person for each of the following:(1) A service person who holds a bachelor’s degree plus 15 college hours;(2) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 15 college hours;(3) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 30 college hours;(4) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 45 college hours; and(5) A service person who holds a master’s degree plus 60 college hours.(f) Each service person is paid a supplement, as set forth in §18A-4-5 of this code, of $164 per month, subject to the provisions of that section. These payments: (i) Are in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Pay Scale Pay Grade, any specific additional amounts prescribed in this section and article and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5b of this code; (ii) are paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) are considered a part of the state minimum salaries for service personnel.(g) When any part of a school service person’s daily shift of work is performed between the hours of 6:00 p. m. and 5:00 a. m. the following day, the employee is paid no less than an additional $10 per month and one half of the pay is paid with local funds.(h) Any service person required to work on any legal school holiday is paid at a rate one and one-half times the person’s usual hourly rate.(i) Any full-time service personnel required to work in excess of their normal working day during any week which contains a school holiday for which they are paid is paid for the additional hours or fraction of the additional hours at a rate of one and one-half times their usual hourly rate and paid entirely from county board funds.(j) A service person may not have his or her daily work schedule changed during the school year without the employee’s written consent and the person’s required daily work hours may not be changed to prevent the payment of time and one-half wages or the employment of another employee.(k) The minimum hourly rate of pay for extra duty assignments as defined in §18A-4-8b of this code is no less than one seventh of the person’s daily total salary for each hour the person is involved in performing the assignment and paid entirely from local funds: Provided, That an alternative minimum hourly rate of pay for performing extra duty assignments within a particular category of employment may be used if the alternate hourly rate of pay is approved both by the county board and by the affirmative vote of a two-thirds majority of the regular full-time persons within that classification category of employment within that county: Provided, however, That the vote is by secret ballot if requested by a service person within that classification category within that county. The salary for any fraction of an hour the employee is involved in performing the assignment is prorated accordingly. When performing extra duty assignments, persons who are regularly employed on a one-half day salary basis shall receive the same hourly extra duty assignment pay computed as though the person were employed on a full-day salary basis.(l) The minimum pay for any service personnel engaged in the removal of asbestos material or related duties required for asbestos removal is their regular total daily rate of pay and no less than an additional $3 per hour or no less than $5 per hour for service personnel supervising asbestos removal responsibilities for each hour these employees are involved in asbestos-related duties. Related duties required for asbestos removal include, but are not limited to, travel, preparation of the work site, removal of asbestos, decontamination of the work site, placing and removal of equipment and removal of structures from the site. If any member of an asbestos crew is engaged in asbestos-related duties outside of the employee’s regular employment county, the daily rate of pay is no less than the minimum amount as established in the employee’s regular employment county for asbestos removal and an additional $30 per each day the employee is engaged in asbestos removal and related duties. The additional pay for asbestos removal and related duties shall be payable entirely from county funds. Before service personnel may be used in the removal of asbestos material or related duties, they shall have completed a federal Environmental Protection Act-approved training program and be licensed. The employer shall provide all necessary protective equipment and maintain all records required by the Environmental Protection Act.(m) For the purpose of qualifying for additional pay as provided in §18A-5-8 of this code, an aide is considered to be exercising the authority of a supervisory aide and control over pupils if the aide is required to supervise, control, direct, monitor, escort, or render service to a child or children when not under the direct supervision of a certified professional person within the classroom, library, hallway, lunchroom, gymnasium, school building, school grounds, or wherever supervision is required. For purposes of this section, "under the direct supervision of a certified professional person" means that certified professional person is present, with and accompanying the aide.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home